Maryland, session 2025, HB0012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
1–313.
– 1 –

Ch. 57 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) There is a Field Enforcement Division in the Office of the Executive Director.
(b) (1) The Field Enforcement Division may employ officers and employees as
provided in the State budget.
(2) The officers and employees of the Field Enforcement Division:
(i) shall be sworn police officers;
(ii) shall have the powers, duties, and responsibilities of peace
officers to enforce the provisions of this article relating to:
1. the unlawful importation of alcoholic beverages, tobacco,
and cannabis into the State;
2. the unlawful manufacture of alcoholic beverages, tobacco,
and cannabis in the State;
3. the transportation and distribution throughout the State
of alcoholic beverages, tobacco, and cannabis that are manufactured illegally and on which
any alcoholic beverages taxes, tobacco taxes, or cannabis taxes imposed by the State are
due and unpaid; and
4. the manufacture, sale, barter, transportation,
distribution, or other form of owning, handling, or dispersing alcoholic beverages, tobacco,
or cannabis by any person not licensed or authorized under this article, provisions of the
Tax – General Article relating to alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or cannabis, or provisions of
the Business Regulation Article relating to alcoholic beverages, tobacco, or cannabis; [and]
(iii) MAY ISSUE A CITATION OR OTHER CHARGING DOCUMENT TO
A PERSON WHO HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION OF § 10–108 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE; AND
(IV) may make cooperative arrangements for and work and cooperate
with the Office of the Comptroller, local State’s Attorneys, sheriffs, bailiffs, police, and other
prosecuting and peace officers to enforce this article.
(c) The Field Enforcement Division:
(1) shall consult with and advise the local State’s Attorneys and other law
enforcement officials and police officers regarding enforcement problems in their respective
jurisdictions; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 57
(2) may recommend changes to improve the administration of this article,
provisions of the Tax – General Article relating to alcoholic beverages, tobacco, and
cannabis, and provisions of the Business Regulation Article relating to tobacco.
6–207.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 36–1102 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) In a prosecution for selling alcoholic beverages OR
TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL without an appropriate license, proof that the defendant
displayed or offered alcoholic beverages OR TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL for sale, or kept
a place of business where alcoholic beverages OR TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL were
displayed or offered for sale, is prima facie evidence that the defendant sold alcoholic
beverages OR TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL.
36–1102.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Hemp” has the meaning stated in § 14–401 of the Agriculture Article.
(3) “Tetrahydrocannabinol” means:
(i) any tetrahydrocannabinol, including
delta–8–tetrahydrocannabinol, delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol, and
delta–10–tetrahydrocannabinol, regardless of how derived;
(ii) any other cannabinoid, except cannabidiol that the
Administration determines to cause intoxication; and
(iii) any other chemically similar compound, substance, derivative, or
isomer of tetrahydrocannabinol, as identified by the Administration.
(4) “Tincture” means a solution that is:
(i) dissolved in alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oil; and
(ii) distributed in a dropper bottle of 4 ounces or less.
(b) (1) A person may not sell or distribute a product intended for human
consumption or inhalation that contains more than 0.5 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol
per serving or 2.5 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol per package unless the person is
licensed under § 36–401 of this title and the product complies with the:
– 3 –

Ch. 57 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) manufacturing standards established under § 36–203 of this
title;
(ii) laboratory testing standards established under § 36–203 of this
title; and
(iii) packaging and labeling standards established under § 36–203 of
this title.
(2) A person may not sell or distribute a product described under
paragraph (1) of this subsection to an individual under the age of 21 years.
(c) A person may not sell or distribute a cannabinoid product that is not derived
from naturally occurring biologically active chemical constituents.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section and subject to paragraph
(2) of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for a person to sell or distribute a
hemp–derived tincture intended for human consumption that contains:
(i) a ratio of cannabidiol to tetrahydrocannabinol of at least 15 to 1;
and
(ii) 2.5 milligrams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol per serving and
100 milligrams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol per package.
(2) To sell or distribute a hemp–derived tincture under this subsection, a
person must provide, as required by the Administration, tincture samples for the purpose
of testing to determine chemical potency and composition levels and to detect and quantify
contaminants.
36–1104.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 36–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL OR DISTRIBUTE A PRODUCT CONTAINING
TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL THAT VIOLATES THE POTENCY, PACKAGING, OR
LABELING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 36–203 OR § 36–203.1 OF THIS TITLE OR ANY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THOSE SECTIONS.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL OR DISTRIBUTE A PRODUCT THAT IS
ADVERTISED AS CONTAINING AN AMOUNT OF TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL THAT
VIOLATES § 36–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 57
(2) ADVERTISING UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
INCLUDES PACKAGING, LABELING, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION.
(D) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY SEIZE, DESTROY, OR CONFISCATE A
PRODUCT THAT IS:
(1) OFFERED OR DISPLAYED FOR SALE TO A CONSUMER IN A
LOCATION THAT IS NOT APPROPRIATELY LICENSED UNDER SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
(2) THE SUBJECT OF A VIOLATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF
THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) IF A PERSON WHO IS NOT A CANNABIS LICENSEE VIOLATES
SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION, THE PERSON:
(I) MAY BE CHARGED BY A CITATION; AND
(II) IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS
SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000.
(2) IF A CANNABIS LICENSEE VIOLATES SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF
THIS SECTION, THE LICENSEE IS SUBJECT TO DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY THE
ADMINISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 36–202 OF THIS TITLE.
Article – Criminal Law
10–108.
(a) A person who distributes products containing delta–8– or
delta–10–tetrahydrocannabinol, including a person licensed under Title 16, Title 16.5, Title
16.7, Title 16.9, or Title 17 of the Business Regulation Article, may not distribute, purchase
for sale, or sell a product containing delta–8– or delta–10–tetrahydrocannabinol to an
individual under the age of 21 years.
(b) In a prosecution for a violation of this section, it is a defense that the defendant
examined the purchaser’s or recipient’s driver’s license, or other valid identification issued
by a governmental unit, that positively identified the purchaser or recipient as being at
least 21 years old.
(c) Any website owned, managed, or operated by a person who distributes or sells
a product containing delta–8– or delta–10–tetrahydrocannabinol shall employ a neutral
age–screening mechanism that verifies that the user is at least 21 years old, including by
using an age–gate, age–screen, or age–verification mechanism.
– 5 –

Ch. 57 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to a fine not exceeding:
(1) $300 for a first violation;
(2) $1,000 for a second violation occurring within 2 years after the first
violation; and
(3) $3,000 for each subsequent violation occurring within 2 years after the
preceding violation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 6 –